California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) The physician and surgeon being available by telephone or other electronic communication method at the time the PA examines the patient.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as prohibiting the board from requiring the physical presence of a physician and surgeon as a term or condition of a PA’s reinstatement, probation, or imposing discipline.

(g) “Regulations” means the rules and regulations as set forth in Division 13.8 (commencing with Section 1399.500) of Title 16 of the California
 Code of
 Regulations.

(h) “Routine visual screening” means noninvasive, nonpharmacological simple testing for visual acuity, visual field defects, color blindness, and depth perception.

(i) “Program manager” means the staff manager of the diversion program, as designated by the executive officer of the board. The program manager shall have background experience in dealing with substance abuse issues.

(j) “Organized health care system” includes a licensed clinic as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, an outpatient setting as described in Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 1248) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, a health facility as described
 in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, a county medical facility as described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, an accountable care organization, a home health agency, a physician’s office, a professional medical corporation, a medical partnership, a medical foundation, and any other entity that lawfully provides medical
 services and is in compliance with Article 18 (commencing with Section 2400) of Chapter 5.

(k) “Practice agreement” means the writing, developed through collaboration among one or more physicians and surgeons and one or more physician assistants, that defines the medical services the physician assistant is authorized to perform pursuant to Section 3502 and that grants approval for physicians and surgeons on the staff of an organized health care system to supervise one or more physician assistants in
 the organized health care system. Any reference to a delegation of services agreement relating to physician assistants in any other law shall have the same meaning as a practice agreement.

(l) “Other specified medical services” means tests or examinations performed or ordered by a PA practicing in compliance with this chapter or regulations of the board or the Medical Board of California promulgated under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 2.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a PA may perform medical services as authorized by this chapter if the following requirements are met:

(1) The PA renders the services under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon who is not subject to a disciplinary condition imposed by the Medical Board of California or by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California prohibiting that supervision or prohibiting the employment of a physician assistant.

(2) The PA renders the services pursuant to a practice agreement that meets the requirements of Section 3502.3.

(3) The
 PA is competent to perform the services.

(4) The PA’s education, training, and experience have prepared the PA to render the services.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a physician assistant performing medical services under the supervision of a physician and surgeon may assist a doctor of podiatric medicine who is a partner, shareholder, or employee in the same medical group as the supervising physician and surgeon. A physician assistant who assists a doctor of podiatric medicine pursuant to this subdivision shall do so only according to patient-specific orders from a supervising physician and surgeon.

(2) A supervising physician and surgeon shall be available to the physician assistant for
 consultation when assistance is rendered pursuant to this subdivision. A physician assistant assisting a doctor of podiatric medicine shall be limited to performing those duties included within the scope of practice of a doctor of podiatric medicine.

(c) Nothing in regulations shall require that a physician and surgeon review or countersign a medical record of a patient treated by a physician assistant, unless required by the practice agreement. The board may, as a condition of probation or reinstatement of a licensee, require the review or countersignature of records of patients treated by a physician assistant for a specified duration.

(d) This chapter does not authorize the performance of medical services in any of the following areas:

(1) The determination of the refractive states of the human eye, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or frames for the aid thereof.

(2) The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training, or orthoptics.

(3) The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact lenses to, the human eye.

(4) The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene or the work of a dental auxiliary as defined in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600).

(e) This section shall not be construed in a manner that shall preclude the performance of routine visual screening as defined in
 Section 3501.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a PA rendering services in a general acute care hospital as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall be supervised by a physician and surgeon with privileges to practice in that hospital. Within a general acute care hospital, the practice agreement shall establish policies and procedures to identify a physician and surgeon who is supervising the PA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 3.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.1.

In addition to the medical services authorized in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 3502, and except as prohibited by Section 3502, a PA may furnish or order a drug or device subject to all of the following:

(a) The PA shall furnish or order a drug or device in accordance with the practice agreement and consistent with the PA’s educational preparation or for which clinical competency has been established and maintained.

(b) (1) A practice agreement authorizing a PA to order or furnish a drug or device shall specify which PA or PAs may furnish or order a drug or device, which drugs or devices may be furnished or
 ordered, under what circumstances, the extent of physician and surgeon supervision, the method of periodic review of the PA’s competence, including peer review, and review of the practice agreement.

(2) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (1), if the practice agreement authorizes the PA to furnish a Schedule II controlled substance, the practice agreement shall address the diagnosis of the illness, injury, or condition for which the PA may furnish the Schedule II controlled substance.

(c) The PA shall furnish or order drugs or devices under physician and surgeon supervision. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician and surgeon, but does require the following:

(1) Adherence to adequate supervision as agreed to in the practice agreement.

(2) The physician and surgeon be available by telephone or other electronic communication method at the time the PA examines the patient.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the PA may furnish or order only those Schedule II through Schedule V controlled substances under the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) that have been agreed upon in the practice agreement.

(2) The PA may furnish or order Schedule II or III controlled substances, as defined in Sections 11055 and 11056, respectively, of the Health and Safety
 Code, in accordance with the practice agreement or a patient-specific order approved by the treating or supervising physician and surgeon.

(e) (1) The PA has satisfactorily completed a course in pharmacology covering the drugs or devices to be furnished or ordered under this section or has completed a program for instruction of PAs that meet the requirements of Section 1399.530 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, as that provision read on June 7, 2019.

(2) A physician and surgeon through a practice agreement may determine the extent of supervision necessary pursuant to this section in the furnishing or ordering of drugs and devices.

(3) PAs who hold an active license, who are authorized
 through a practice agreement to furnish Schedule II controlled substances, and who are registered with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, and who have not successfully completed a one-time course in compliance with Sections 1399.610 and 1399.612 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, as those provisions read on June 7, 2019, shall complete, as part of their continuing education requirements, a course that covers Schedule II controlled substances, and the risks of addiction associated with their use, based on the standards developed by the board. The board shall establish the requirements for satisfactory completion of this subdivision. Evidence of completion of a course meeting the standards, including pharmacological content, established in Sections 1399.610 and 1399.612 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, as those provisions read on June 7, 2019,
 shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this section.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Furnishing” or “ordering” shall include the following:

(A) Ordering a drug or device in accordance with the practice agreement.

(B) Transmitting an order of a supervising physician and surgeon.

(C) Dispensing a medication pursuant to Section 4170.

(2) “Drug order” or “order” means an order for medication that is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, issued by a PA as an individual practitioner, within the meaning of Section 1306.02 of Title 21 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, (1) a drug order issued pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as a prescription of a supervising physician; (2) all references to “prescription” in this code and the Health and Safety Code shall include drug orders issued by physician assistants; and (3) the signature of a PA on a drug order issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be the signature of a prescriber for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 4.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.1.5.

This chapter or any other provision of law shall not be construed to prohibit a physician assistant from administering or providing buprenorphine to a patient, or transmitting orally, or in writing on a patient’s record or in a drug order, an order to a person who may lawfully furnish buprenorphine when done in compliance with the provisions of the Comprehensive Addiction Recovery Act (Public Law 114-198), as enacted on July 22, 2016, including the following:

(a) The requirement that the physician assistant complete not fewer than 24 hours of initial training provided by an organization listed in sub-subclause (aa) of subclause (II) of clause (iv) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 823 of Title 21 of the United States Code, or any other organization
 that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines is appropriate for the purposes of that sub-subclause, that addresses the following:

(1) Opioid maintenance and detoxification.

(2) Appropriate clinical use of all drugs approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder.

(3) Initial and periodic patient assessments, including substance use monitoring.

(4) Individualized treatment planning, overdose reversal, and relapse prevention.

(5) Counseling and recovery support services.

(6) Staffing roles and considerations.

(7) Diversion control.

(8) Other best practices, as identified by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(b) The alternative requirement that the physician assistant have other training or experience that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines will demonstrate the ability of the physician assistant to treat and manage opiate-dependent patients.

(c) The requirement that the physician assistant be supervised by, or work in collaboration with, a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 2.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician assistant may perform the physical examination and any other specified medical services that are required pursuant to Section 2881 of the Public Utilities Code and Sections 44336, 49406, 49423, 49455, 87408, 87408.5, and 87408.6 of the Education Code, practicing in compliance with this chapter, and may sign and attest to any certificate, card, form, or other documentation evidencing the examination or other specified medical services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   (SB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.3.

(a) (1) A practice agreement shall include provisions that address the following:

(A) The types of medical services a physician assistant is authorized to perform.

(B) Policies and procedures to ensure adequate supervision of the physician assistant, including, but not limited to, appropriate communication, availability, consultations, and referrals between a physician and surgeon and the physician assistant in the provision of medical services.

(C) The methods for the continuing evaluation of the competency
 and qualifications of the physician assistant.

(D) The furnishing or ordering of drugs or devices by a physician assistant pursuant to Section 3502.1.

(E) Any additional provisions agreed to by the physician assistant and physician and surgeon.

(2) A practice agreement shall be signed by both of the following:

(A) The physician assistant.

(B) One or more physicians and surgeons or a
 physician and surgeon who is authorized to approve the practice agreement on behalf of the staff of the physicians and surgeons on the staff of an organized health care system.

(3) A delegation of services agreement in effect prior to January 1, 2020, shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(4) A practice agreement may designate a PA as an agent of a supervising physician and surgeon.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require approval of a practice agreement by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in addition to any other practices that meet the general criteria set forth in this chapter or regulations
 adopted by the board or the Medical Board of California, a practice agreement may authorize a PA to do any of the following:

(1) Order durable medical equipment, subject to any limitations set forth in Section 3502 or the practice agreement. Notwithstanding that authority, nothing in this paragraph shall operate to limit the ability of a third-party payer to require prior approval.

(2) For individuals receiving home health services or personal care services, after consultation with a supervising physician and surgeon, approve, sign, modify, or add to a plan of treatment or plan of care.

(3) After performance of a physical examination by the PA under the supervision of a physician and surgeon consistent with this
 chapter, certify disability pursuant to Section 2708 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The Employment Development Department shall implement this paragraph on or before January 1, 2017.

(c) This section shall not be construed to affect the validity of any practice agreement in effect prior to the effective date of this section or those adopted subsequent to the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 5.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.35.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in recognition of the vital role physician assistants play in delivering safe, effective, and accessible health care across California, a comprehensive review of practice agreement structures be undertaken in consultation with relevant stakeholders. This review should consider how practice agreements are utilized in other states and evaluate their potential benefits or detriments to patient care, workforce efficiency, and regulatory oversight.

(b) This section shall not be construed to impose any additional regulatory responsibilities or workload on the board. The board may collaborate, as appropriate, with the Legislature and other stakeholders to inform future policy discussions through existing
 processes and expertise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 9.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.4.

(a) In order to receive authority from the physician assistant’s supervising physician and surgeon to perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253, a physician assistant shall achieve clinical competency by successfully completing requisite training in performing these procedures. The requisite training shall include a clinical and didactic component and be provided by any of the following:

 (1) Training
 programs approved by the board pursuant to Section 3513.

(2) Training to perform medical services that augment the physician assistant’s current areas of competency pursuant to Section 1399.543 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A course offered by a state or national health care professional or accreditation organization.

(4) Training based on the competency-based training protocols established by the Health Workforce Pilot Project (HWPP) No. 171 through the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, now known as the Department of Health Care Access and Information.

(5) Training and evaluation of clinical competency, performed at a clinic or hospital, on performing abortion by aspiration techniques that is provided by any of the following who have performed the procedure themselves:

(A) A physician and surgeon.

(B) A nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife authorized to perform abortion by
 aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2725.4.

(C) A physician assistant authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to this section.

(b) A physician assistant who has completed training and achieved clinical
 competency, as required by this section, and is functioning pursuant to Section 3502 shall be authorized to perform abortions by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253 without the personal presence of a supervising physician and surgeon unless specified by their practice agreement.

(c) A physician assistant shall practice abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253 consistent with applicable standards of care, within the scope of their clinical and professional education and training, and pursuant to their practice agreement.

(d) It is unprofessional conduct for any physician assistant to perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253 without prior completion of training and validation of clinical competency.

(e) A person authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall not be punished, held
 liable for damages in a civil action, or denied any right or privilege for any action relating to the evaluation of clinical competency of a physician assistant pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(f) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize a person with a license or certificate to practice as a physician assistant to perform abortion by aspiration techniques after the first trimester of pregnancy.

(g) For purposes of this section, exclusively online or simulation-based training programs that do not include mandatory clinical hours involving direct patient care shall not meet the clinical training requirements in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician assistant may perform those medical services permitted pursuant to Section 3502 during any state of war emergency, state of emergency, or state of local emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, and at the request of a responsible federal, state, or local official or agency, or pursuant to the terms of a mutual aid operation plan established and approved pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), regardless of whether the physician assistant’s approved supervising physician is available to supervise the physician assistant, so long as a licensed physician is available to render the appropriate
 supervision. “Appropriate supervision” shall not require the personal or electronic availability of a supervising physician if that availability is not possible or practical due to the emergency. The local health officers and their designees may act as supervising physicians during emergencies without being subject to approval by the Medical Board of California. At all times, the local health officers or their designees supervising the physician assistants shall be licensed physicians and surgeons. Supervising physicians acting pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the limitation on the number of physician assistants supervised under Section 3516.

No responsible official or mutual aid operation plan shall invoke this section except in the case of an emergency that endangers the health of individuals. Under no circumstances shall this section be invoked as the result of a labor dispute or other dispute concerning collective
 bargaining.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 30.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

No person other than one who has been licensed to practice as a physician assistant shall practice as a physician assistant or in a similar capacity to a physician and surgeon or podiatrist or hold themselves out as a “physician assistant,” or shall use any other term indicating or implying that they are a physician assistant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 17.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.5.

(a) A person licensed under this chapter who in good faith renders emergency care at the scene of an emergency that occurs outside both the place and course of that person’s employment shall not be liable for any civil damage as a result of any acts or omissions by that person in rendering the emergency care.

(b) This section shall not be construed to grant immunity from civil damages to any person whose conduct in rendering emergency care is grossly negligent.

(c) In addition to the immunity specified in subdivision (a), the provisions of Article 17 (commencing with Section 2395) of Chapter 5 shall apply to a person licensed under this chapter when acting pursuant to delegated authority from an approved supervising physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 736, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [3504. - 3511.]

3504.

(a) There is established a Physician Assistant Board. The board consists of nine members.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 10.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Physician Assistant Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 32.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 3504 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committee of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 11.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

The members of the board shall include four physician assistants, one physician and surgeon who is also a member of the Medical Board of California, and four public members. Upon the expiration of the term of the member who is a member of the Medical Board of California, that position shall be filled by a physician assistant. Upon the expiration of the term of the member who is a member of the Medical Board of California, above, there shall be appointed to the board a physician and surgeon who is also a member of the Medical Board of California who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member and whose functions shall include reporting to the Medical Board of California on the actions or discussions of the board. Following the expiration of the term of the member
 described above, the board shall include five physician assistants, one physician and surgeon, and four public members.

Each member of the board shall hold office for a term of four years expiring on January 1st, and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of a successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs. No member shall serve for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired terms.

The Governor shall appoint the licensed members qualified as provided in this section and two public members. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 33.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3506.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 34.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.

The appointing power has power to remove from office any member of the board, as provided in Section 106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 35.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3508.

(a) The board may convene from time to time as deemed necessary by the board.

(b) Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given at least two weeks in advance to those persons and organizations who express an interest in receiving notification.

(c) The board shall receive permission of the director to meet more than six times annually. The director shall approve meetings that are necessary for the board to fulfill its legal responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 36.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3509.

It shall be the duty of the board to:

(a) Establish standards for, and issue licenses to, applicants qualifying for licensure under this chapter as a physician assistant.

(b) Require the examination of applicants for licensure as a physician assistant who meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 12.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3509.5.

The board shall elect annually a president and a vice president from among its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 33.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3510.

The board may adopt, amend, and repeal regulations as may be necessary to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter. All regulations shall be in accordance with, and not inconsistent with, the provisions of this chapter. Such regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 34.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3511.

Five members shall constitute a quorum for transacting any business. The affirmative vote of a majority of those present at a meeting of the board shall be required to carry any motion. The physician and surgeon who serves as an ex officio member shall not be counted for purposes of a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 40.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Certification and Approval [3513. - 3519.5.]

3513.

The board shall recognize the approval of training programs for physician assistants approved by a national accrediting organization. Physician assistant training programs accredited by a national accrediting agency approved by the board shall be deemed approved by the board under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 13.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3514.1.

The board shall formulate by regulation guidelines for the consideration of applications for licensure as a physician assistant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 14.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3516.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a physician assistant licensed by the board shall be eligible for employment or supervision by a physician and surgeon who is not subject to a disciplinary condition imposed by the Medical Board of California prohibiting that employment or supervision.

(b) Except as provided in Section 3502.5, a physician and surgeon shall not supervise more than eight physician assistants at any one time.

(c) The Medical Board of California may restrict a physician and surgeon to supervising specific types of physician assistants including, but not limited to, restricting a physician and surgeon from supervising physician assistants outside of the field of specialty of the physician
 and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 15.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3517.

(a) The board shall require a written examination of physician assistants in the manner and under the rules and regulations as it shall prescribe, but the examination shall be conducted in that manner as to ensure that the identity of each applicant taking the examination will be unknown to all of the examiners until all examination papers have been graded. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, or by regulation, no physician assistant applicant shall receive approval under this chapter without first successfully passing an examination given under the direction of the board.

(b) Examinations for licensure as a physician assistant may be required by the board under a uniform examination system, and for that purpose the board may make those arrangements with
 organizations furnishing examination material as may, in its discretion, be desirable. The licensure examination for physician assistants shall be held by the board at least once a year with such additional examinations as the board deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 36.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3518.

The board shall keep a current register for licensed PAs, if applicable. The register shall show the name of each licensee, the licensee’s last known address of record, and the date of the licensee’s licensure. Any interested person is entitled to obtain a copy of the register in accordance with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) upon application to the board together with a sum as may be fixed by the board, which amount shall not exceed the cost of this list so furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 9.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3519.

The board shall issue a license to all physician assistant applicants who meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Provide evidence of successful completion of an approved program.

(b) Pass any examination required under Section 3517.

(c) Not be subject to denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Section 3527.

(d) Pay all fees required under Section 3521.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 37.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3519.5.

(a) The board may issue a probationary license to an applicant subject to terms and conditions, including, but not limited to, any of the following conditions of probation:

(1) Practice limited to a supervised, structured environment where the applicant’s activities shall be supervised by another physician assistant.

(2) Total or partial restrictions on issuing a drug order for controlled substances.

(3) Continuing medical or psychiatric treatment.

(4) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(5) Enrollment and successful completion of a clinical training program.

(6) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(7) Restrictions against engaging in certain types of medical services.

(8) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the licensee.

(c) Enforcement and monitoring of the probationary conditions shall be under the jurisdiction of the board. These proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 38.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revenue [3520. - 3526.]

3520.

Within 10 days after the beginning of each calendar month, the board shall report to the Controller the amount and source of all collections made under this chapter and at the same time pay all those sums into the State Treasury, where they shall be credited to the Physician Assistant Fund, which fund is hereby created. All money in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation of the Legislature, to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 16.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3521.1.

The fees to be paid by physician assistants are to be set by the board as follows:

(a) An application fee charged to each physician assistant applicant shall be sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to not more than eighty dollars ($80).

(b) An initial license fee charged to each physician assistant to whom a license is issued shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) A biennial license renewal fee charged to each physician assistant who holds a license shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) The delinquency fee is seventy-five dollars ($75).

(e) The duplicate license fee is ten dollars ($10).

(f) The fee for a letter of endorsement, letter of good standing, or letter of verification of licensure shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 16.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3521.3.

(a) The board may establish, by regulation, a system for the placement of a license on a retired status, upon application, for a physician assistant who is not actively engaged in practice as a physician assistant or any activity that requires them to be licensed by the board.

(b) No licensee with a license on a retired status shall engage in any activity for which a license is required.

(c) The board shall deny an applicant’s application for a retired status license if the license is canceled or if the license is suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(d) Beginning one year from the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), if an applicant’s license is delinquent, the board shall deny an applicant’s application for a retired status license.

(e) The board shall establish minimum qualifications for a retired status license.

(f) The board may exempt the holder of a retired status license from the renewal requirements described in Section 3524.5.

(g) The board shall establish minimum qualifications for the restoration of a license in a retired status to an active status. These minimum qualifications shall include, but are not limited to, continuing education and payment of a fee as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 3521.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 54.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3523.

All physician assistant licenses shall expire at 12 midnight of the last day of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.

The board shall establish by regulation procedures for the administration of a birthdate renewal program, including, but not limited to, the establishment of a system of staggered license expiration dates and a pro rata formula for the payment of renewal fees by physician assistants affected by the implementation of the program.

To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on an electronic form, or other form, provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee. Each application form shall contain a legal
 verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 18.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.
